Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1203
License; required.

After January 1, 1969, it shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of debt management without first obtaining a license as required in sections 69-1201 to 69-1217.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 3, p. 1180.